Massachusetts, session 194th, H2829.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (g), and further under the subparagraph title of "Group 2", of section 3 of
chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the most recent edition, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words, "Cushing hospital" the following words:- “employees of a city or town
who are employed as Harbormasters and assistant Harbormasters, and appointed pursuant to
chapter 102 of the General Laws
of 1